Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Part 3

Qualification and Registration Generally

62-2-301. General requirements for registration.

The board shall, upon application for a certificate of registration, on the prescribed form and the payment by the applicant of a fee as prescribed by the board, consider the application, and, in proper cases, issue a certificate of registration, either as an architect, as an engineer, as a registered interior designer or as a landscape architect, to any person who submits evidence satisfactory to the board that the person is fully qualified to practice architecture, engineering or landscape architecture or use the title “registered interior designer.” No person shall be eligible for registration who does not speak and write the English language and who is not of good character and repute.

No person shall be granted any combination of licenses as architect, engineer, registered interior designer or landscape architect unless the person makes a separate application and pays a separate fee for each profession, both original fee and annual renewal fee, and is found by the board to be qualified for a license in each profession.

Acts 1979, ch. 263, § 9; T.C.A., § 62-209; Acts 1988, ch. 990, § 15; 1991, ch. 164, §§ 18-20; 1997, ch. 33, §§ 9, 10.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1991, ch. 164, § 26 provided that the requirement of a person to register to obtain a certificate of registration to use the title “interior designer” (now “registered interior designer”) shall not take effect until January 1, 1994.

Cross-References. Qualification and registration of architects, title 62, chapter 2, part 5.

Qualification and registration of engineers, title 62, chapter 2, part 4.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Licenses, §§ 2, 8.

62-2-302. Board members examining and voting on applicants.

In determining the qualifications of applicants for registration as architects, a majority vote of the architect members of the board only shall be required.

In determining the qualifications of applicants for registration as engineers, a majority vote of the engineer members of the board only shall be required.

In determining the qualifications of applicants for registration as landscape architects, the one (1) landscape architect board member and one (1) architect or engineer board member only shall be required.

In determining the qualifications of applicants for registration as registered interior designers, the registered interior designer board member and one (1) architect, engineer or landscape architect board member only shall be required; provided, that for the first registered interior designer board member no such vote shall be required.

Applicants for registration as architects shall be examined by architect members of the board only and applicants for registration as engineers shall be examined by the engineer members of the board only.

Applicants for registration as landscape architects shall be examined by the landscape architect member and one (1) architect and engineer member of the board.

Applicants for registration as registered interior designers shall be examined by the registered interior designer member and one (1) architect and engineer member of the board.

In the event the board denies issuance of a certificate to an applicant, no refund of any part of the application fee shall be returned by the board to the applicant.

For purposes of this section, the member of the board appointed under the authority of § 62-2-201(b) is not a voting member of the board.

Acts 1979, ch. 263, § 22; T.C.A., § 62-222; Acts 1988, ch. 990, § 16; 1991, ch. 164, §§ 21, 22; 1997, ch. 33, §§ 11, 12.

62-2-303. Additional evidence.

Applicants for registration in cases where the evidence originally presented in the application does not appear to the board conclusive or as warranting the issuance of a certificate may be required to present other evidence as required by the board.

Acts 1979, ch. 263, § 23; T.C.A., § 62-223.

62-2-304. Comity — Issuance of certificate of registration.

The board may, upon proper application for a certificate of registration, issue a certificate of registration as an architect, engineer, registered interior designer or landscape architect to any person who holds a like unexpired certificate of qualification or registration issued to the person by any state, territory or possession of the United States or of any country; provided, that the applicant's qualifications meet the requirements of this chapter and the rules established by the board. Any applicant for registration as an architect or landscape architect pursuant to this section shall hold an unexpired national certificate issued by the National Council of Architectural Registration Boards or the Council of Landscape Architectural Registration Boards and shall present proof of the certificate upon application to the board.

In addition to subsection (a), the board may, upon proper application for a certificate of registration, issue a certificate of registration as an architect to any person whose qualifications do not meet the requirements of this chapter and the rules established by the board if that person holds a like unexpired certificate of qualification or registration issued to such person by any state, territory, or possession of the United States or by any country; holds an unexpired national certificate issued by the National Council of Architectural Registration Boards; and presents proof of the certificates upon application to the board. The issuance of a certificate of registration pursuant to this subsection (b) is at the sole discretion of the board's determination that the applicant has qualifications suitable to be issued a certificate of registration in this state.

Acts 1979, ch. 263, § 24; T.C.A., § 62-224; Acts 1988, ch. 990, § 17; 1989, ch. 292, § 1; 1991, ch. 164, § 23; 1997, ch. 33, § 13; 1998, ch. 770, § 1; 2016, ch. 838, § 3.

62-2-305. Replacement of certificate.

A new certificate of registration to replace any certificate lost, destroyed or mutilated may be issued subject to the rules and regulations of the board.

Acts 1979, ch. 263, § 25; T.C.A., § 62-225.

62-2-306. Effect of certificate — Seal.

The issuance of a certificate of registration by this board shall be evidence that the person named in the certificate is entitled to all the rights and privileges of an architect, engineer or landscape architect while the certificate remains unrevoked or unexpired.

Each registered architect, registered engineer and registered landscape architect shall obtain and keep a seal of the design authorized by the board bearing the registrant's name, the registrant's registration number, the words “Registered Architect,” “Registered Engineer” or “Registered Landscape Architect” and the words “State of Tennessee” or “Tennessee.” The registrant shall stamp with the registrant's seal all original sheets of any bound set of plans and the first sheet of any specifications or reports prepared by the registrant or under the registrant's responsible charge. No architect, engineer or landscape architect shall affix the architect's, engineer's or landscape architect's seal or stamp to any document that has not been prepared by the architect, engineer or landscape architect or under the architect's, engineer's or landscape architect's responsibility. Plans, specifications and reports issued by the registrants shall be stamped with the seal during the life of a registrant's certificate, but it is unlawful for anyone to stamp or seal any document with the seal after the certificate of the registrant named on the seal has expired or has been revoked.

As used in this section, “registered architects,” “registered engineers” or “registered landscape architects” means only those registered architects, registered engineers or registered landscape architects who are required by this chapter to be registered in this state.

The board may also adopt rules and regulations for the affixing to and endorsement of the registrant's seal on architectural, engineering and landscape architectural documents that may be necessary to implement compliance with this section.

Notwithstanding subsection (b), an architect or engineer, after fully reviewing and modifying, as required, may affix that architect's or engineer's seal or stamp to a document, or part of a document, that has been prepared by another architect or engineer, if the document has been designated as a state standard prototype, pursuant to § 12-4-116 [see now § 12-4-111]. The architect or engineer who is involved in a state standard prototypical re-use project, as provided in § 12-4-116 [see now § 12-4-111], shall fully review and modify, as required, the documents and then affix that architect's or engineer's seal or stamp and signature on the documents. The architect or engineer shall become solely responsible for all documents on which that architect's or engineer's seal or stamp is placed.

Acts 1979, ch. 263, § 26; 1981, ch. 349, § 1; T.C.A., § 62-226; Acts 1988, ch. 800, § 1; 1988, ch. 990, § 18; 1989, ch. 307, § 4; 1995, ch. 113, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 12-4-116, referred to in (e), was transferred to § 12-4-111 by Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 79, effective July 1, 2013.

62-2-307. Expiration and renewal of certificate — Certificates for retirees.

Certificates of registration shall expire two (2) years following the date of their issuance or renewal and are invalid on that date unless renewed.

It is the duty of the board to notify every person registered under this chapter of the date of the expiration of that person's certificate and the amount of the fee required for its renewal for two (2) years. The notice shall be mailed at least one (1) month in advance of the date of the expiration of the certificate.

Renewal may be effected at any time during the thirty (30) days preceding the certificate expiration date by the payment of the fee determined by and payable to the board.

Certificates of registration shall be subject to late renewal for six (6) months following their expiration date by payment of the renewal fee plus a penalty as set by the board for each month or fraction of a month that elapses before payment is tendered.

Any person wishing to renew a certificate later than six (6) months after its expiration date shall reapply for certification. The board may, in its discretion, waive any further examination of the applicant and any further education and experience beyond that obtained at the time of the applicant's original registration in this state.

Notwithstanding any provision in this chapter to the contrary, the board has the authority to establish, by rule and regulation, procedures and criteria pursuant to which persons who are retired may continue to use the titles of “architect,” “engineer,” “landscape architect” or “registered interior designer” without the payment of a registration renewal fee.

Acts 1979, ch. 263, § 27; 1981, ch. 349, § 2; T.C.A., § 62-227; Acts 1989, ch. 523, §§ 106, 107; 1995, ch. 171, § 1; 1997, ch. 33, § 14; 1997, ch. 127, § 1.

Cross-References. Director of division of regulatory boards to promulgate rules concerning certain license renewal dates, § 56-1-302.

62-2-308. Denial, suspension or revocation of certificate — Reissuance.

The board may refuse to issue or renew, and revoke or suspend, the certificate of registration of any architect, engineer, landscape architect or registered interior designer registered under this chapter who is found guilty:

Of any fraud or deceit in obtaining a certificate of registration;

Of gross negligence, incompetency or misconduct in the practice of architecture, engineering, landscape architecture or in the use of the title “registered interior designer”;

Of failure to obtain, keep and utilize the registrant's seal as provided in this chapter;

By a court of competent jurisdiction of breach of contract for professional services;

Of any violation of the rules adopted by the board;

Of having the person's right to practice architecture, engineering, landscape architecture or use the title registered interior designer suspended or revoked by another state or national registration board; or

By a court of competent jurisdiction of any felony. However, an action taken under this subdivision (a)(1)(G) shall be subject to the applicable provisions of the Fresh Start Act that are compiled in chapter 76, part 1 of this title.

Any person may prefer charges in writing to the board against any architect, engineer, landscape architect or registered interior designer registered under this chapter on any of the grounds listed in subdivision (a)(1).

The affirmative vote of five (5) or more members of the board shall be necessary in order to revoke or suspend the certificate of registration of any architect, engineer, landscape architect or registered interior designer registered under this chapter.

The board may reissue a certificate of registration to any person whose certificate has been revoked; provided, that five (5) or more members of the board vote in favor of reissuance for reasons the board may deem sufficient.

The board members are officers of the state in carrying out the duties imposed by this chapter and as such have the full measure of governmental immunity provided by law.

Acts 1979, ch. 263, § 28; 1980, ch. 451, § 2; 1980, ch. 627, § 4; 1981, ch. 349, § 3; T.C.A., § 62-228; Acts 1983, ch. 71, § 1; 1988, ch. 990, § 19; 1991, ch. 164, § 24; 1997, ch. 33, §§ 15-17; 2015, ch. 291, §§ 1, 2; 2018, ch. 745, § 2.